Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AEDA YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to the Asian Economic Development Association (AEDA) for outdoor programs for youth. new text end